California statutes. Education Code
 persons during the training are being paid a cash wage or salary by a private employer, except in the case of registered student apprentices, when the school district, county superintendent of schools, or any school administered by the State Department of Education elects to provide workers’ compensation insurance, or unless the person or firm under whom the persons are receiving work experience or occupational training elects to provide workers’ compensation insurance. A registered student apprentice is a registered apprentice who is (1) at least 16 years of age, (2) a full-time high school pupil in the 10th, 11th, or 12th grade, and (3) in an apprenticeship program for registered student apprentices registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards. An apprentice, while attending related and supplemental instruction classes, shall be considered to be in the employ of the apprentice’s employer and not subject to this section, unless the apprentice is unemployed. Whenever this work experience
 education, cooperative vocational education, community classroom education, or job shadowing, or student apprenticeship program registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for registered student apprentices, is under the supervision of a regional occupational center or program operated by two or more school districts pursuant to Section 52301, the district of residence of the persons receiving the training shall be deemed the employer for the purposes of this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “job shadowing experience” means a visit to a workplace for the purpose of career exploration for no less than three hours and no more than 25 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a pupil may participate in a job shadowing experience for up to 40 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session if
 the principal of the school in which the pupil is enrolled certifies that it is necessary for the pupil’s participation in a career technical education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

51769.5.

Sections 1292, 1293, and 1294 of the Labor Code shall not apply to work experience education programs established pursuant to this article if all of the following occur:

(a) The work experience coordinator determines that the students have been sufficiently trained in the employment or work otherwise prohibited.

(b) Parental approval is obtained.

(c) The principal or the counselor of the student has determined that the progress of the student toward graduation will not be impaired.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51770 (as enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.3. Energy Education [51770. - 51772.]

51770.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that despite various energy conservation measures, energy costs have continued to increase and will likely increase in the future. The Legislature also finds and declares that a model comprehensive energy education program to be made available to pupils enrolled in the public schools is required in order to acquaint pupils with the limited availability of energy resources, the need for effective energy conservation measures, and other issues addressing our future energy needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1192, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51771.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall provide for the development of a model energy education program appropriate for use by school districts maintaining kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. In developing the model program, the superintendent may utilize or incorporate existing instructional materials in the area of energy and other available resources, so long as the superintendent determines that they are reasonably balanced and objective, or are capable of being used in conjunction with other materials to establish a reasonably balanced and objective perspective. The model program, including the review of the utilization or incorporation of existing instructional materials in the area of energy and other available resources, shall be developed in consultation with the California Energy Commission, and shall be periodically updated to incorporate additional technological changes.

The model program shall include an accurate, objective assessment of the nation’s current and projected energy supplies and a review of the nation’s progress in the development of alternative energy resources, with an emphasis on renewable energy sources such as solar and wind power.

(b) The model program shall be designed to provide instruction to pupils regarding all of the following:

(1) The finite nature of our nation’s current basic energy resources.

(2) The effects of energy extraction from nonrenewable resources on the environment.

(3) An examination of the balance between consumer demands for energy and the need for energy conservation, as well as the effect of present energy usage on the energy needs of future generations.

(4) An examination of policy issues regarding the use of alternative energy resources, including the weatherization of homes and businesses, individual and business energy conservation, the availability of incentives to promote the development of renewable energy resources, and the cost-effectiveness of various types of energy production such as fossil fuels, nuclear energy, solar power, wind power, and geothermal energy.

(5) An examination of the viability of energy conservation as an energy resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1192, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51772.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make the model program developed under this article available to each school district. School districts shall have the option to include the model program as part of their required or authorized courses of instruction, but it is the intent of the Legislature that the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall take any steps necessary to encourage school districts to provide some form of energy education instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1192, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.4. Work Experience Education Program Reviews [51775. - 51778.]

51775.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that work experience education is an integral part of the total educational process of pupils, and that work experience education can provide opportunities for pupils to acquire lifelong employability skills, as well as opportunities for pupils to develop general and specific occupational skills.

The Legislature recognizes that there is a need to provide for the review of work experience education programs offered by school districts offering these programs at least once every three years, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to establish a mechanism for the review and improvement of work experience education programs offered in the public schools to ensure that pupils receive high quality instruction. It is further the intent of the Legislature to establish a system whereby school districts and county offices of education may form consortia for purposes of conducting quality reviews of work experience education programs and for the sharing of information, resources, and technical assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51776.

The governing board of each school district offering work experience education programs may elect to provide for independent onsite program review of work experience education programs at least once every three years in the district offering these programs. If the governing board elects to provide for an independent onsite program review, it shall not be required to participate in the federally required consolidated compliance review conducted by the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51777.

(a) For purposes of facilitating the program reviews required by Section 51776, the governing boards of two or more school districts may agree to establish a consortium of participating school districts. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may determine whether the size of a school district would be counterproductive to the establishment of a consortium with that school district and another school district, thereby making it advisable that the school district is reviewed by its own certified program reviewers. In cases in which the Superintendent of Public Instruction has determined that the onsite review shall be conducted by certified program reviewers from that district, the reviewers may conduct reviews in any school of the district other than the school in which they are employed. In all other onsite reviews, the reviews shall not be conducted by persons who are employed by the district.

(b) Each consortium shall maintain a list of available certified program reviewers submitted by participating school districts.

(c) Trained members of each consortium shall review work experience education programs in participating school districts. A report on the results of the review shall be submitted to the governing board of the school district, the State Department of Education, and the Work Experience Education Consortia Steering Committee established under Section 51778.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51778.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish a Work Experience Education Consortia Steering Committee comprised of certificated representatives of consortia of school districts established under this article. The steering committee, in consultation with the superintendent, utilizing applicable program standards and regulations regarding work experience education programs shall develop all of the following materials:

(1) Program quality indicators.

(2) Training materials.

(3) Guide books.

(4) Program review reports.

(b) The Work Experience Education Consortia Steering Committee shall contract with appropriate personnel to conduct in-service training programs for work experience education teachers and coordinators who will be conducting schoolsite reviews of work experience education programs. The training shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) A program quality review instrument.

(2) The compliance review instrument developed by the department.

(3) Reporting and review materials.

(4) Program review methodologies.

(5) The preparation of summary reports.

Only persons who have been certified by the steering committee as having completed the training program shall be eligible to conduct work experience education program quality reviews.

(c) Utilizing the compliance review instrument described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the advisory committee shall recommend a followup review for schools that have not met a prescribed number of the work experience education compliance criteria. The followup review required by this subdivision shall be conducted within one year of the initial review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Genetic Diseases and Disorders Instruction [51780. - 51782.]

51780.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to generate and encourage the development of educational programs for the prevention of genetic diseases, disorders, and birth defects, in grades 7 through 12, and thereby to reduce the annual incidence of genetic diseases, disorders, and birth defects through preventive educational programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective September 23, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

51781.

(a) The department shall prepare, and distribute to school districts, guidelines and plans for the preparation of comprehensive educational programs for the prevention of genetic diseases, disorders, and birth defects, and, in cooperation with those county offices of education that desire to participate, shall assist school districts in developing comprehensive genetic diseases and disorders plans and programs.

(b) For the purposes set forth in subdivision (a), the department shall conduct, on an annual basis, at least 25 workshops and training programs for approximately 2,500 school district teams of certified school personnel, using instructional materials, curricula, and
 guidelines developed by the department for dissemination at training programs conducted during the year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 51.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

51782.

The instructional program in genetic diseases and disorders shall provide pupils with practical information concerning, but not limited to, the following elements:

(a) Genetics.

(b) Maternal and prenatal health care.

(c) Transmission of genetic diseases and disorders.

(d) Human development.

(e) Nutrition.

(f) Effects of environmental factors on human development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective September 23, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Aviation Education [51790. - 51792.]

51790.

The Department of Education shall aid and assist local school districts in the development and conduct of a program of aviation education. The Department of Aeronautics may aid and assist in the selection of airports and pilots used by the local school districts in flight indoctrination and instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51791.

The governing board of each district is encouraged to develop aims and purposes of aviation education designed to include: (a) integration of appropriate aviation concepts throughout the elementary school with units of instruction in science, social studies, and arithmetic; (b) aviation experiences in junior high schools in the areas of social studies, science, and arithmetic; and (c) elective courses in senior high schools and four-year high schools including air transportation, vocational training, economic, social and political implications of aviation, the science of flight, history of aviation, and flight experience where appropriate airports, planes, and pilots are available, and the need for this instruction is indicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51792.

The Department of Aeronautics is authorized to make available to public schools offering actual flight experience as part of the regular curriculum a basic insurance program and to assure that adequate supervision and precautionary measures are taken by the flight school operators contracted to provide services for public school students. The governing board of any school district offering actual flight experience as part of the regular curriculum may participate in the basic insurance program provided by the commission and pay from the funds of the district a pro rata share of the cost of the insurance program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. School Instructional Gardens [51795. - 51798.]

51795.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) School gardens provide an interactive, hands-on learning environment in which pupils learn composting and waste management techniques, fundamental concepts about nutrition and obesity prevention, and the cultural and historical aspects of our food supply. School gardens also foster a better understanding and appreciation of where food comes from, how food travels from the farm to the table, and the important role of agriculture in the state, national, and global economy.

(b) Encouraging and supporting school gardens creates opportunities for children to learn to make healthier food choices, participate more successfully in their education experiences, and develop a deeper appreciation of their community.

(c) School garden programs can equally enhance any subject area including science, environmental education, mathematics, reading, writing, art, nutrition, physical education, history, and geography. School gardens provide a unique setting in which improved pupil performance can be achieved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

51796.

(a) The Instructional School Gardens Program is hereby established for the promotion, creation, and support of instructional school gardens through the allocation of grants, and through technical assistance provided, to school districts, charter schools, or county offices of education. The program shall be administered by the department.

(b) The Superintendent may convene an interagency working group on instructional school gardens that may include, but not be limited to, representatives of the department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the State Department of Public Health, and the California Integrated Waste Management Board. The working group may advise the Superintendent on the following:

(1) Effective and efficient means of encouraging school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education to develop and maintain a quality instructional school garden program.

(2) The availability of state and nonstate resources and technical assistance to help school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education in establishing and maintaining instructional school gardens.

(3) Public and private partnerships available to assist school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education in using instructional school gardens to complement the academic program of participating schools.

(c) The Superintendent may establish an advisory group involving other agencies and groups with expertise in instructional school gardens,
 including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Education Interagency Network. The purpose of the advisory group is to support program efforts through technical assistance, resources, in-kind support, site visits, and other related efforts.

(d) (1) The Superintendent shall use existing resources to comply with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(2) The Department of Food and Agriculture, the State Department of Public Health, and the California Integrated Waste Management Board shall use existing resources to comply with subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 47.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51796.2.

(a) A school district, charter school, or county office of education may apply to the Superintendent for funding for a three-year grant under this article in a manner determined by the Superintendent, in order to develop and maintain an instructional school garden. The application, at a minimum, shall indicate the school or schools at which the instructional school gardens are, or are to be, located; the grade level or grade levels to be targeted; the potential number of classes within the grade levels and number of pupils who would use the instructional school gardens; and the intended items of expenditure for any funds received. The application also shall include an explanation of the six-month reporting requirement specified in Section 51796.5.

(b) The Superintendent shall distribute the grants applied for pursuant to subdivision (a) to school districts, charter schools, or county offices of education. Each grant shall be not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per schoolsite, except that a district, charter school, or county office of education that applies on behalf of at least one schoolsite with an enrollment of 1,000 or more pupils may receive a grant of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per schoolsite with an enrollment of 1,000 or more pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 48.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51796.5.

As a condition of the receipt of funds pursuant to this article, a school district, charter school, or county office of education, within six months of the final expenditure of funds received, shall report to the Superintendent, in conjunction with the interagency working group convened pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51796, in a manner prescribed by the Superintendent, regarding the use of funds and the manner in which the instructional school garden or gardens are used to complement the academic program of the participating school or schools. A school district or county office of education may submit one report for all of the schools that have received grants that are under the jurisdiction of the district or county office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 437, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

51797.

During its annual discretionary grant funding process, the California Integrated Waste Management Board may give preferential consideration to providing an appropriate level of funding to the program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 49.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51798.

A school district, charter school, or county office of education that is operating a school garden may sell produce grown in the school garden, regardless of whether the school participates in the Instructional School Gardens Program, if the school district, charter school, or county office of education complies with applicable federal, state, and local health and safety requirements for the production, processing, and distribution of the produce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 2367)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Home Teaching [51800. - 51802.]

51800.

The governing board of any school district, may employ teachers known as “home teachers” not exceeding one teacher for every 500 units of average daily attendance in the elementary or high schools of the district as shown by the report of the county superintendent of schools for the next preceding school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51801.

The home teacher shall work in the homes of the pupils, instructing children and adults in matters relating to school attendance and preparation therefor, in sanitation, in the English language, in household duties, such as purchase, preparation, and use of food and clothing, and in the fundamental principles of the American system of government and the rights and duties of citizenship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51802.

(a) The governing board of a school district maintaining a home teaching program, or providing home instruction as authorized by law for pupils with disabilities, may provide home teaching or instruction on Saturday.

(b) No pupil shall be required to attend a home teaching program or home instruction on Saturday without the consent of his or her parent or legal guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Community Service Classes [51810. - 51815.]

51810.

The governing board of any school district maintaining secondary schools is authorized without the approval of the department to establish and maintain community service classes in civic, vocational, literacy, health, family and consumer sciences, technical, and general education, including, but not limited to, classes in the fields of dance, music, theater, visual arts, handicraft, science, literature, nature study, nature contacting, aquatic sports, and athletics. These classes shall be designed to provide instruction and to contribute to the physical, mental, moral, economic, or civic development of the individuals or groups enrolled in the classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 543, Sec. 8.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

51811.

Community service classes shall be open for the admission of adults and of such minors as in the judgment of the governing board may profit therefrom.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51812.

Community service classes may be convened at such hours and for such length of time during the day or evening and at such period and for such length of time during the school year as may be determined by the governing board of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51813.

Governing boards shall have the authority to provide for granting appropriate certificates or other recognition of skill or accomplishment in such classes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51814.

Attendance or average daily attendance in community service classes pursuant to this article shall not be reported to the State Department of Education for apportionment. No apportionment from state funds shall be made to establish or maintain such classes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51815.

Governing boards may expend from the general fund of the district any money which is budgeted for community services to establish and maintain community service classes and may charge student fees not to exceed the cost of maintaining such classes or may provide instruction in such classes for remuneration by contract, or with contributions or donations of individuals or groups.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Local Educational Agency Contracting [51827. - 51827.]

51827.

(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the governing board of a school district or educational joint powers authority, the governing body of a charter school, or the county superintendent of schools shall adopt a policy for the local educational agency to comply with in order to evaluate and approve contractors. The policy shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) A local educational agency shall not expend public funds for a contract unless the materials, programs, and activities are nonsectarian and comply with nondiscrimination provisions of state and federal law.

(2) A local educational agency shall not expend public funds for a contract that pays for tuition or fees for a pupil at a private
 school that has filed an affidavit pursuant to Section 33190, except if required pursuant to a pupil’s individualized education program.

(3) (A) Financial payments or gifts shall not be offered by a local educational agency to a pupil, prospective pupil, or a pupil’s parent, guardian, or relative as an incentive for enrollment, referral, or retention.

(B) A local educational agency shall not offer any financial incentives to employees to manipulate or falsify pupil attendance records and reports. Nothing in this subparagraph is intended to prohibit a local educational agency from offering financial incentives to employees for activities to encourage pupil engagement and reengagement of chronically absent pupils, including, but not limited to, home visits.

(4) For a nonclassroom-based charter
 school, contracts shall itemize costs attributed to credentialed staff, administrative staff, and instruction and related services with sufficient detail to determine a qualifying expense for purposes of a funding determination.

(5) A local educational agency shall ensure contracts reflect a reasonable market value.

(6) A local educational agency shall not purchase or contract for annual and season passes or membership to amusement or theme parks, zoos, or family entertainment activities, except that a local educational agency may purchase or contract for single-use admission, meals, and transportation that is aligned with educational opportunities and assignments by teachers, or for graduation, school celebrations, or co-curricular activities.

(7) (A) A local educational agency shall only contract with an entity that has a business license or business certificate, where applicable, and
 that has appropriate insurance, for the service being offered. Government agencies are not required to have a business license.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), this paragraph shall not apply to either of the following:

(i) Local educational agency contracts with a family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, that possess a valid Family Child Care Home license issued by the State Department of Social Services and that is compliant with Section 1597.531 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Contracts between a local educational agency serving as an alternative payment program provider pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and any license-exempt provider, as described in subdivision (d) or (f) of Section 1596.792 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) A local educational agency shall not contract with a pupil or a pupil’s parent, guardian, or relative for services provided exclusively to that pupil, except for any of the following persons who are compensated by the local educational agency to provide school-related transportation for a pupil:

(A) A parent or legal guardian.

(B) A relative, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of
 Section 361.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) A court-appointed educational rights holder.

(D) A court-appointed special advocate.

(9) A local educational agency shall not reimburse parents or guardians for any activities or services. This paragraph does not prohibit a local educational agency from reimbursing parents or guardians for activities or services for pupils with disabilities pursuant to an individualized education program and required by a legal settlement or agreement.

(10) A contractor who interacts with pupils outside the immediate supervision and control of a school employee shall have policies and procedures related to
 pupil and site safety, including in virtual settings, emergency response, and accident reporting that are reasonable for the instruction or activity.

(11) Contractor personnel interacting with pupils shall have a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 45125.1.

(12) As part of a contract with a local educational agency, contractors shall provide evidence of qualification and expertise for the activities to be provided, in accordance with policies of the governing board or body of the local educational agency.

(13) As part of a contract with a local educational agency, contractors shall not charge fees to a pupil or the pupil’s parent or legal
 guardian, except as otherwise authorized for any of the following:

(A) California state preschool programs, as specified in Section 8252.

(B) The 21st Century High School After School Safety and Enrichment for Teens (High School ASSETs) program established pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 8420) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(C) The After School Education and Safety Program pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(D) Expanded learning opportunity programs pursuant to Section 46120.

(E) Schoolage childcare programs, as specified in Section 1596.793 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) Childcare programs, as specified in Section 10290 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Auditing the approval of, and compliance with, policies enacted in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be included in the audit guide, Standards and Procedures for Audits of California K-12 Local Educational Agencies, described in Section 14502.1.

(c) This section does not supersede or invalidate a contract that is in effect on or before July 1, 2027. If a contract is in effect on or before July 1, 2027, the contract shall remain in effect until the expiration of the contract or the parties to the agreement negotiate a successor agreement that will be operative after July 1, 2027, that
 complies with this section. A local educational agency shall not enter into a contract or make an amendment or other ancillary agreement to an existing contract on or after the effective date of the act adding this section that would be operative after July 1, 2027, unless it would comply with this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 9.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Consumer Economics Programs [51833. - 51833.]

51833.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, with the approval of the State Board of Education, plan and develop a one-semester instructional program entitled consumer economics for use in schools maintaining any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive. When completed, the program shall be made available to all school districts and schools with grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The instructional program shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Fundamentals of banking for personal use.

(2) Elementary contracts.

(3) Consumer guides to purchasing.

(4) Uses and costs of credit.

(5) Types and costs of insurance.

(6) Forms of governmental taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 440.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Driver Training [51850. - 51854.]

51850.

The governing board of a school district maintaining a high school or high schools, a county superintendent of schools, and the California Youth Authority and State Department of Education in providing programs of high school education, may prescribe regulations determining who can profit by and who shall receive instruction in automobile driver training; provided, however, that no pupil shall be permitted to enroll in automobile driver training unless such pupil is presently enrolled in a course of instruction in automobile driver education, or has satisfactorily completed such course. The regulations shall be subject to such standards for driver education and driver
 training as may be prescribed by the State Board of Education. Where driver training is provided, such course of instruction shall be given in one or more of the grades 9, 10, 11, or 12. Pupils shall be at least 15 years and six months of age at the time of completion of a driver training course.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51851.

A course of instruction in automobile driver education shall meet all of the following:

(a) Be of at least 212 semester periods and shall be taught by a qualified instructor.

(b) Provide the opportunity for pupils to take driver education within the regular schoolday, and within the regular academic year, as defined in Section 37250.
 Additional classes may be offered at the discretion of the local school district governing board, the county superintendent of schools, California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education, to accommodate the pupils who have failed or who cannot otherwise enroll in the regular schoolday program. For purposes of this section, the regular schoolday shall be that time during which classes are maintained in the courses of instruction provided for in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 51000), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 51200), Article 1 (commencing with Section 51500), Article 2 (commencing with Section 51510), Article 3 (commencing with Section 51520), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 51530) of Chapter 4, and Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of this part, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 58400) of Part 31.

(c) Be completed by the pupil within the academic year or summer session in which it was
 begun.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 650, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

51852.

A course of instruction in the laboratory phase of driver education shall include, for each student enrolled in the class, instruction under one of the following plans:

(a) Plan One. A minimum of 12 hours allocated as follows:

(1) A minimum of six hours of on-street behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor.

(2) A minimum of six hours in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor for the purposes of observation. Practice driving on an off-street multiple-car driving range approved by the department under the supervision of a qualified instructor may be substituted for all or part of the observation time.

(b) Plan Two. A minimum of 24 hours allocated as follows:

(1) Three hours of on-street behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor.

(2) Six hours in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor for the purposes of observation. Practice driving on an off-street multiple-car driving range approved by the department under the supervision of a qualified instructor
 may be substituted for all or part of the observation time.

(3) Twelve hours of instruction by a qualified instructor in a driving simulator approved by the department.

(4) At least three additional hours of instruction specified in one or more of paragraphs 1 to 3, inclusive, of this subdivision.

(c) Plan Three. A minimum of 24 hours allocated as follows:

(1) Three hours of on-street behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor.

(2) Six hours in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor for the purpose of observation.

(3) Twelve hours
 of instruction by a qualified instructor on an off-street multiple-car driving range.

(4) At least three additional hours of instruction specified in one or more of paragraphs 1 to 3, inclusive, of this subdivision.

(d) Plan Four. A minimum of 24 hours allocated as follows:

(1) Three hours of on-street behind-the-wheel practice driving instruction in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor.

(2) Three hours in a dual-control automobile with a qualified instructor for the purpose of observation.

(3) Eighteen hours of instruction by a qualified instructor in a driving simulator approved by the department and on an off-street multiple-car driving range. The
 governing board of the district shall establish the proportion of time to be utilized in simulators and on the off-street multiple-car driving range.

(e) Plan Five.
